Maryland, session 2026, SB0210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–403.
An incarcerated individual in the program shall be supervised by means of:
(1) electronic devices; and
(2) direct contact by employees of the WARRANT APPREHENSION UNIT
OF THE INTELLIGENCE AND INVESTIGATIVE Division.
3–412.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0210*

SENATE BILL 210
(a) The Commissioner shall [employ correctional] AUTHORIZE employees OF
THE WARRANT APPREHENSION UNIT OF THE INTELLIGENCE AND INVESTIGATIVE
DIVISION to monitor and provide security for incarcerated individuals in the program.
(b) [A correctional] AN employee [designated] OF THE WARRANT
APPREHENSION UNIT HAS THE AUTHORITY PROVIDED UNDER § 10–702 OF THIS
ARTICLE to monitor incarcerated individuals in the program [may:
(1) obtain and execute search warrants as authorized under § 3–415 of this
subtitle; and
(2) make arrests as authorized under § 2–207 of the Criminal Procedure
Article.
(c) A correctional employee authorized to make arrests under this section shall:
(1) meet the minimum qualifications required by the Maryland Police
Training and Standards Commission; and
(2) complete satisfactorily the training prescribed by the Maryland Police
Training and Standards Commission].
10–702.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Offender” [has the meaning stated in § 6–101 of this article] MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL ON PROBATION, PAROLE, OR MANDATORY
SUPERVISION; OR
(II) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL DETAINED OR CONFINED IN
A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(3) “Program” has the meaning stated in § 3–401, § 5–202, OR § 6–101 of
this article.
(b) There is a Warrant Apprehension Unit in the Intelligence and Investigative
Division.
(c) The Director of the Intelligence and Investigative Division may authorize
employees of the Warrant Apprehension Unit of the Intelligence and Investigative Division
to:
(1) execute warrants for the retaking of offenders;

SENATE BILL 210 3
(2) execute warrants for the arrest of [probationers] OFFENDERS for
whom a warrant is issued for an alleged violation of [probation] THE PROGRAM;
(3) obtain and execute search warrants as authorized under § 3–415 OR §
6–109 of this article; and
(4) arrest offenders in the program as authorized under § 2–207 of the
Criminal Procedure Article.
(d) An Intelligence and Investigative Division employee who is authorized to
make arrests under this section shall:
(1) meet the minimum qualifications required by the Maryland Police
Training and Standards Commission; and
(2) complete satisfactorily the training prescribed by the Maryland Police
Training and Standards Commission.
(e) An Intelligence and Investigative Division employee who is authorized to
make arrests under this section may also exercise the powers of a peace officer and police
officer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.